extras/dictionaries/la.aff
SFX C Y 716
SFX C io      io              io        
SFX C io      ioque           io        
SFX C io      ione            io        
SFX C io      iove            io        
SFX C io      is              io        
SFX C io      isque           io        
SFX C io      isne            io        
SFX C io      isve            io        
SFX C io      it              io        
SFX C io      itque           io        
SFX C io      itne            io        
SFX C io      itve            io        
SFX C io      imus            io        
SFX C io      imusque         io        
SFX C io      imusne          io        
SFX C io      imusve          io        
SFX C io      itis            io        
SFX C io      itisque         io        
SFX C io      itisne          io        
SFX C io      itisve          io        
SFX C io      iunt            io        
SFX C io      iuntque         io        
SFX C io      iuntne          io        
SFX C io      iuntve          io        
SFX C io      iebam           io        
SFX C io      iebamque        io        
SFX C io      iebamne         io        
SFX C io      iebamve         io        
SFX C io      iebas           io        
SFX C io      iebasque        io        
SFX C io      iebasne         io        
SFX C io      iebasve         io        
SFX C io      iebat           io        
SFX C io      iebatque        io        
SFX C io      iebatne         io        
SFX C io      iebatve         io        
SFX C io      iebamus         io        
SFX C io      iebamusque      io        
SFX C io      iebamusne       io        
SFX C io      iebamusve       io        
SFX C io      iebatis         io        
SFX C io      iebatisque      io        
SFX C io      iebatisne       io        
SFX C io      iebatisve       io        
SFX C io      iebant          io        
SFX C io      iebantque       io        
SFX C io      iebantne        io        
SFX C io      iebantve        io        
SFX C io      iam             io        
SFX C io      iamque          io        
SFX C io      iamne           io        
SFX C io      iamve           io        
SFX C io      ies             io        
SFX C io      iesque          io        
SFX C io      iesne           io        
SFX C io      iesve           io        
SFX C io      iet             io        
SFX C io      ietque          io        
SFX C io      ietne           io        
SFX C io      ietve           io        
SFX C io      iemus           io        
SFX C io      iemusque        io        
SFX C io      iemusne         io        
SFX C io      iemusve         io        
SFX C io      ietis           io        
SFX C io      ietisque        io        
SFX C io      ietisne         io        
SFX C io      ietisve         io        
SFX C io      ient            io        
SFX C io      ientque         io        
SFX C io      ientne          io        
SFX C io      ientve          io        
SFX C io      ias             io        
SFX C io      iasque          io        
SFX C io      iasne           io        
SFX C io      iasve           io        
SFX C io      iat             io        
SFX C io      iatque          io        
SFX C io      iatne           io        
SFX C io      iatve           io        
SFX C io      iamus           io        
SFX C io      iamusque        io        
SFX C io      iamusne         io        
SFX C io      iamusve         io        
SFX C io      iatis           io        
SFX C io      iatisque        io        
SFX C io      iatisne         io        
SFX C io      iatisve         io        
SFX C io      iant            io        
SFX C io      iantque         io        
SFX C io      iantne          io        
SFX C io      iantve          io        
SFX C io      irem            io        
SFX C io      iremque         io        
SFX C io      iremne          io        
SFX C io      iremve          io        
SFX C io      ires            io        
SFX C io      iresque         io        
SFX C io      iresne          io        
SFX C io      iresve          io        
SFX C io      iret            io        
SFX C io      iretque         io        
SFX C io      iretne          io        
SFX C io      iretve          io        
SFX C io      iremus          io        
SFX C io      iremusque       io        
SFX C io      iremusne        io        
SFX C io      iremusve        io        
SFX C io      iretis          io        
SFX C io      iretisque       io        
SFX C io      iretisne        io        
SFX C io      iretisve        io        
SFX C io      irent           io        
SFX C io      irentque        io        
SFX C io      irentne         io        
SFX C io      irentve         io        
SFX C io      i               io        
SFX C io      ique            io        
SFX C io      ine             io        
SFX C io      ive             io        
SFX C io      ite             io        
SFX C io      iteque          io        
SFX C io      itene           io        
SFX C io      iteve           io        
SFX C io      ito             io        
SFX C io      itoque          io        
SFX C io      itone           io        
SFX C io      itove           io        
SFX C io      itote           io        
SFX C io      itoteque        io        
SFX C io      itotene         io        
SFX C io      itoteve         io        
SFX C io      iunto           io        
SFX C io      iuntoque        io        
SFX C io      iuntone         io        
SFX C io      iuntove         io        
SFX C io      ire             io        
SFX C io      ireque          io        
SFX C io      irene           io        
SFX C io      ireve           io        
SFX C io      iendum          io        
SFX C io      iendumque       io        
SFX C io      iendumne        io        
SFX C io      iendumve        io        
SFX C io      iendi           io        
SFX C io      iendique        io        
SFX C io      iendine         io        
SFX C io      iendive         io        
SFX C io      iendo           io        
SFX C io      iendoque        io        
SFX C io      iendone         io        
SFX C io      iendove         io        
SFX C io      iundum          io        
SFX C io      iundumque       io        
SFX C io      iundumne        io        
SFX C io      iundumve        io        
SFX C io      iundi           io        
SFX C io      iundique        io        
SFX C io      iundine         io        
SFX C io      iundive         io        
SFX C io      iundo           io        
SFX C io      iundoque        io        
SFX C io      iundone         io        
SFX C io      iundove         io        
SFX C io      iens            io        
SFX C io      iensque         io        
SFX C io      iensne          io        
SFX C io      iensve          io        
SFX C io      ientem          io        
SFX C io      ientemque       io        
SFX C io      ientemne        io        
SFX C io      ientemve        io        
SFX C io      ientis          io        
SFX C io      ientisque       io        
SFX C io      ientisne        io        
SFX C io      ientisve        io        
SFX C io      ienti           io        
SFX C io      ientique        io        
SFX C io      ientine         io        
SFX C io      ientive         io        
SFX C io      iente           io        
SFX C io      ienteque        io        
SFX C io      ientene         io        
SFX C io      ienteve         io        
SFX C io      ientes          io        
SFX C io      ientesque       io        
SFX C io      ientesne        io        
SFX C io      ientesve        io        
SFX C io      ientium         io        
SFX C io      ientiumque      io        
SFX C io      ientiumne       io        
SFX C io      ientiumve       io        
SFX C io      ientibus        io        
SFX C io      ientibusque     io        
