extras/dictionaries/la.dic
abortio/C
absilio/C
accio/C
accio/C
adaperio/C
adaudio/C
adblandior/C
addormio/C
adesurio/C
adessurio/C
adhinnio/C
adinvenio/C
adlinio/C
admentior/C
admetior/C
admoenio/C
admolior/C
admugio/C
admunio/C
adnutrio/C
adolescenturio/C
adoperio/C
adopperior/C
adorio/C
adorior/C
adscio/C
adsentio/C
adsentior/C
adservio/C
adsilio/C
adulescenturio/C
advenio/C
aggarrio/C
allinio/C
amaturio/C
ambio/C
amicio/C
amolior/C
annutrio/C
antevenio/C
aperio/C
artio/C
arvenio/C
ascio/C
assalio/C
assentio/C
assentior/C
asservio/C
assilio/C
audio/C
balbutio/C
barbio/C
barrio/C
bipartio/C
bipertio/C
blandio/C
blandior/C
blatio/C
blattio/C
bombio/C
borrio/C
bullio/C
bumbio/C
burio/C
burrio/C
butio/C
cacaturio/C
caecutio/C
calvio/C
canturio/C
carpio/C
catulio/C
catullio/C
caurio/C
cenaturio/C
cio/C
circumamicio/C
circumaperio/C
circumfulcio/C
circumlinio/C
circummoenio/C
circummugio/C
circummunio/C
circumretio/C
circumsaepio/C
circumsaevio/C
circumsilio/C
circumtinnio/C
circumvenio/C
circumvestio/C
circumvincio/C
coenaturio/C
coinquio/C
combullio/C
commentior/C
commetior/C
commoenio/C
commolior/C
commollio/C
communio/C
compartior/C
comparturio/C
compedio/C
comperio/C
comperior/C
compotio/C
concio/C
concio/C
concustodio/C
concustodio/C
condio/C
condormio/C
confercio/C
confinio/C
conforio/C
confulcio/C
congarrio/C
conmentior/C
conmetior/C
conmoenio/C
conmolior/C
conmollio/C
conmunio/C
conparturio/C
conpedio/C
conperio/C
conperior/C
conpotio/C
consaepio/C
consarcio/C
conscio/C
consentio/C
consepelio/C
consepio/C
consipio/C
consopio/C
constabilio/C
contravenio/C
convenio/C
convestio/C
cooperio/C
coperio/C
counio/C
covenio/C
cratio/C
crinio/C
crispio/C
crocio/C
cucubio/C
cucubio/C
cucurrio/C
cunio/C
custodio/C
decutio/C
definio/C
deglutio/C
degluttio/C
degrunnio/C
dehaurio/C
dehorio/C
delargior/C
delenio/C
delinio/C
demetior/C
demolio/C
demolior/C
demollio/C
demorior/C
demuttio/C
dentio/C
deoperio/C
deorio/C
departio/C
depolio/C
depuvio/C
desaevio/C
deservio/C
desilio/C
desulio/C
devenio/C
devestio/C
devincio/C
dictaturio/C
dicturio/C
diffinio/C
dimetior/C
discooperio/C
dispartior/C
dispertior/C
dissentio/C
dissulio/C
dormio/C
ebullio/C
ecfercio/C
efarcio/C
effarcio/C
elargior/C
emetior/C
emollio/C
emugio/C
enutrio/C
erudio/C
essurio/C
etussio/C
evincio/C
exaperio/C
exaudio/C
excratio/C
exfutio/C
exilio/C
exordior/C
expedio/C
expolio/C
exsarcio/C
exsercio/C
extussio/C
farcio/C
febrio/C
ferio/C
finio/C
florio/C
forio/C
fringulio/C
fritinnio/C
fulgurio/C
futio/C
gannio/C
gestio/C
glattio/C
gliccio/C
glutio/C
gnario/C
grundio/C
habiturio/C
hauscio/C
hirquitallio/C
horior/C
hymnio/C
impartio/C
impertio/C
inanio/C
inaurio/C
indormio/C
ineptio/C
infercio/C
inglutio/C
innutrio/C
inpartio/C
inpertio/C
inretio/C
inrugio/C
insaevio/C
insarcio/C
inservio/C
insignio/C
instabilio/C
interblandior/C
interpedio/C
intersepio/C
intrio/C
investio/C
irrubio/C
lapio/C
largior/C
lecturio/C
ligurrio/C
linio/C
lippio/C
mentio/C
metior/C
micturio/C
minurio/C
mitio/C
molio/C
mollio/C
mugio/C
mutio/C
nancio/C
nictio/C
nupturio/C
obaudio/C
obedio/C
obgannio/C
obligurio/C
obmolior/C
oborior/C
obsaepio/C
obsopio/C
obvagio/C
offulcio/C
olfacio/C
operior/C
ordio/C
orior/BC
partior/C
pavio/C
percooperio/C
perhaurio/C
perlinio/C
permunio/C
perpolio/C
persaevio/C
pervenio/C
pipio/C
polio/C
potio/C
praeaudio/C
praedormio/C
praefulcio/C
praemoenio/C
praemollio/C
praepedio/C
praesagio/C
praesentio/C
praeservio/C
praevincio/C
proscripturio/C
prosulio/C
provenio/C
punio/C
raucio/C
rebullio/C
redimio/C
redoperio/C
redormio/C
refercio/C
remetior/C
remollio/C
renutrio/C
repolio/C
resarcio/C
resopio/C
revenio/C
revincio/C
saepio/C
sagio/C
salio/C
sancio/C
sario/C
scaturio/C
scripturio/C
sepelio/C
sepulio/C
sicilio/C
singultio/C
sopio/C
sortior/C
subaperio/C
subblandior/C
subfulcio/C
subgrunnio/C
subsentio/C
subsilio/C
subtinnio/C
subvenio/C
suffulcio/C
suggrunnio/C
superbio/C
supermetior/C
supermunio/C
supervenio/C
surio/C
taciturio/C
tinio/C
tintinnio/C
transilio/C
transsilio/C
trinnio/C
tussio/C
ustuio/C
vagio/C
vesanio/C
vincio/C
